Illinois, session 104th, HB2435.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Telephone Solicitations Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5, 15, 20, and 25 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 413/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. For purposes of this Act:8    "Automatic telephone dialing system" has the meaning set 9forth in the Telephone Consumer Protection Act (47 U.S.C. 10227). The use of an automatic telephone dialing system also 11includes sending a message directly to the recipient's 12voicemail or transmitting an artificial voice to the recipient 13of a telephone call.14    "Caller ID" means the display to the recipient of the call 15of the caller's telephone number or identity.16    "Emergency telephone number" means any telephone number 17which accesses or calls a fire department, law enforcement 18agency, ambulance, hospital, medical center, poison control 19center, rape crisis center, suicide prevention center 20(including the 9-8-8 suicide and crisis lifeline), rescue 21service, the 911 emergency access number provided by law 22enforcement agencies and police departments.23    "Existing business relationship" means a relationship   HB2435 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 05988 SPS 16021 b1formed by:2        (1) a previous purchase, contract, or service 3    agreement between the customer and the caller within the 4    preceding 12 months;5        (2) a current subscription, account, membership, or 6    ongoing transaction for goods or services between the 7    customer and the caller; or8        (3) an inquiry related to goods or services made by 9    the customer to the caller within the preceding 12 months.10    "Subscriber" means: 11        (1) A person who has subscribed to telephone service 12    from a telephone company; or 13        (2) Other persons living or residing with the 14    subscribing person.15    "Telephone solicitation" means any voice communication 16through the use of a telephone by live operators for 17soliciting the sale of goods, or services, or property or 18wrongfully obtaining anything of value.19(Source: P.A. 95-331, eff. 8-21-07.) 20    (815 ILCS 413/15)21    Sec. 15. Method of operation. 22    (a) No person shall solicit the sale of goods or services 23in this State by placing a telephone call during the hours 24between 9 p.m. and 8 a.m.25    (a-5) No person shall initiate a telephone solicitation in   HB2435 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 05988 SPS 16021 b1this State through the use of an automatic telephone dialing 2system. This subsection applies to all commercial telephone 3solicitation intended to be received by a telephone customer 4in this State, unless the person being contacted has expressly 5consented to be contacted in this manner or has an existing 6business relationship with the person initiating the telephone 7solicitation. If a person has previously consented to be 8contacted in a manner otherwise prohibited by this subsection, 9the person shall be allowed to withdraw that consent at any 10time in the same manner that the consent was given. A person to 11whom consent has been given under this subsection shall not 12sell, give, transfer, or assign that consent to another 13person.14    The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to calls 15or alerts: (i) made through an emergency telephone number; 16(ii) made by a unit of local, State, or federal government; 17(iii) made by a government official acting in an official 18capacity; (iv) made by a not-for-profit organization that is 19exempt from taxation under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue 20Code; (v) made by a health care provider, office, and facility 21licensed in this State; (vi) made by a public utility or 22telecommunications carrier in this State as defined in Section 233-105 of the Public Utilities Act; or (vii) otherwise 24permitted by State or federal law.25    (b) A live operator making a telephone solicitation 26soliciting the sale of goods or services shall:   HB2435 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 05988 SPS 16021 b1        (1) immediately state his or her name, the name of the 2    business or organization being represented, and the 3    purpose of the call; and 4        (2) inquire at the beginning of the call whether the 5    person called consents to the solicitation; and 6        (3) if the person called requests to be taken off the 7    contact list of the business or organization, the operator 8    must refrain from calling that person again and take all 9    steps necessary to have that person's name and telephone 10    number removed from the contact records of the business or 11    organization so that the person will not be contacted 12    again by the business or organization. Compliance with 13    Section 310.4(b) of the Federal Trade Commission's 14    Telemarketing Sales Rule shall constitute compliance with 15    this subsection (b)(3) of this Section.16    (c) A person may not initiate a telephone solicitation 17solicit the sale of goods or services by telephone in a manner 18that impedes the function of any caller ID when the telephone 19solicitor's service or equipment is capable of allowing the 20display of the solicitor's telephone number.21(Source: P.A. 90-541, eff. 6-1-98; 91-182, eff. 1-1-00.) 22    (815 ILCS 413/20)23    Sec. 20. Exemptions. 24    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the provisions 25of this Act shall not apply to telephone calls made by an   HB2435 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 05988 SPS 16021 b1autodialer. The provisions of this Act do not apply to 2telephone solicitations calls made by a person who is a 3registered dealer, registered investment adviser, or 4registered salesperson under Section 8 of the Illinois 5Securities Law of 1953 or who is registered as a 6broker-dealer, registered representative, or salesperson of a 7broker-dealer under the federal securities laws, when 8performing acts within the scope of that registration.9    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), all 10telephone solicitations calls must be made in compliance with 11the requirements of subsection (c) of Section 15.12(Source: P.A. 91-182, eff. 1-1-00.) 13    (815 ILCS 413/25)14    Sec. 25. Violations. 15    (a) It is a violation of this Act to make or cause to be 16made telephone solicitations calls to any emergency telephone 17number as defined in Section 5 of this Act. It is a violation 18of this Act to make or cause to be made telephone calls in a 19manner that does not comply with Section 15.20    (b) It is a violation of this Act to continue with a 21solicitation placed by a live operator without the consent of 22the called party.23    (c) It is an unlawful act or practice and a violation of 24this Act for any person engaged in telephone solicitation to 25obtain or submit for payment a check, draft, or other form of   HB2435 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 05988 SPS 16021 b1negotiable paper drawn on a person's checking, savings, or 2other account or on a bond without the person's express 3written consent.4    (d) Enforcement by customer. Any customer injured by a 5violation of this Act, other than a violation of subsection 6(a-5) of Section 15, may bring an action for the recovery of 7damages. Judgment may be entered for 3 times the amount at 8which the actual damages are assessed, plus costs and 9reasonable attorney's attorney fees. Any person who receives a 10telephone solicitation in violation of subsection (a-5) of 11Section 15 may bring an action for damages of $500 for each 12solicitation received, plus costs and reasonable attorney's 13fees. Any damages recoverable under this Section are in the 14alternative to, and not in addition to, any damages that may be 15recovered under the federal Telephone Consumer Protection Act, 1647 U.S.C. 227 et seq.17    (e) Enforcement by Attorney General. Violation of any of 18the provisions of this Act is an unlawful practice under 19Section 2Z of the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 20Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority granted 21to the Attorney General by that Act shall be available to him 22for the enforcement of this Act. In any action brought by the 23Attorney General to enforce this Act, the court may order that 24persons who incurred actual damages be awarded the amount at 25which actual damages are assessed.26(Source: P.A. 91-182, eff. 1-1-00; 91-761, eff. 1-1-01.)